Utah statutes.
17-50-402.   Payment or rejection of claims.

(1)  If the county executive finds that any claim presented is not payable by the county or is not a proper county charge, the county executive shall reject the claim.

(2) (a)  If the claim is found to be a proper county charge, but greater in amount than is justly due, the county executive may allow the claim in part and may order a warrant drawn for the portion allowed.

(b)  If the claimant is unwilling to receive the amount in full payment, the county executive may again consider the claim.

(3)  No claim may be paid if paying the claim would exceed the current unencumbered funds.

